Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. State policy. It is the policy of the State  of Oregon to support ongoing en-
gagement between offshore wind energy developers and:
(1) The Southwestern Oregon Workforce Investment Board;
(2) The Oregon International Port of Coos Bay;
(3) The Port of Brookings Harbor;
(4) The Port of Newport;
(5) The Confederated Tribes of  Coos, Lower Umpqua and Siuslaw Indians, the Coquille
Indian Tribe  and other Indian tribes impacted by offshore wind energy development that
want to engage in the offshore wind energy development process; and
(6) Communities and organizations impacted by  offshore wind energy development that
want to engage in the offshore wind energy development process.
Enrolled House Bill 4080 (HB 4080-B) Page 1
SECTION 2. State policy. It is the policy of  the State of Oregon that the interconnection
of offshore energy  projects to the Oregon coast electric grid be carried out in a manner that
promotes the reliability and resilience of this state’s electric system.
SECTION 3. Offshore Wind Roadmap. (1) The Department of Land Conservation and De-
velopment shall develop an Offshore Wind Roadmap that  defines standards to be considered
in the processes related to offshore  wind energy development and approval. The standards
defined in the Offshore Wind Roadmap must support:
(a) Effective stakeholder engagement;
(b) Local and regional coastal communities;
(c) The creation of economic opportunities and sustainment of existing local and  regional
economies;
(d) The creation of an offshore wind energy workforce  that is local, trained, housed and
equitable;
(e) Protection of tribal cultural and archaeological resources,  culturally significant
viewsheds and other interests of Indian tribes;
(f) Protection of the environment and marine species; and
(g) Achievement of state energy and climate policy objectives, including energy resource
diversity, reliability and resilience of state and regional energy systems.
(2) The department shall conduct  outreach and engagement with state agencies, local
governments and affected communities to support development  of the Offshore Wind
Roadmap.
(3) The department may solicit and accept gifts, grants, donations and other moneys
from public and private sources for the purpose of covering the costs of carrying out  the
provisions of this section.  Moneys received as provided in this subsection are continuously
appropriated to the department for carrying out the provisions of this section.
(4) The Land Conservation and Development Commission may adopt rules as necessary
to carry out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 4.
Assessment of enforceable policies. (1) The Department of Land Conserva-
tion and Development shall conduct an assessment of the state enforceable  policies that may
be used in the federal consistency review of offshore wind energy leasing decisions and  any
other actions related to offshore wind energy development off of the Oregon coast.
(2) The assessment must focus on the adequacy of existing enforceable policies  and
agency capacity to address reasonably foreseeable effects to state  coastal uses and resources
that would result from offshore wind energy development.
(3) The Land Conservation and Development Commission may adopt rules as necessary
to carry out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 5. Report to Legislative Assembly. The Department of Land Conservation  and
Development shall draft  a report that summarizes the department’s activities in carrying
out sections 3 and 4 of this 2024 Act. The department shall submit  the report in the manner
provided by ORS 192.245, and may include  recommendations for legislation, administrative
policy and budget, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to marine
renewable energy and coastal resources no later than September 1, 2025.
SECTION 6. Sunset. Section 5 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 7. State policy. It is the policy of the State of Oregon to promote economic
diversification and resilience in offshore wind energy development by ensuring that all de-
velopers and contractors involved  in the construction, operation or maintenance of offshore
wind energy projects and the construction of a port development  project that is necessary
for the development of  offshore wind energy projects follow industry-leading strong labor and
supply chain standards.
SECTION 8. Covered projects; standards. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Covered project” means:
(A) An offshore wind energy project.
Enrolled House Bill 4080 (HB 4080-B) Page 2
(B) A port development project necessary  for the development of an offshore wind energy
project.
(C) A project related to manufacturing  or supply chain that is located on port property
and facilitates the construction, operation or maintenance of  an offshore wind energy
project.
(b) “Lockout” means any refusal by a developer or contractor to permit workers to  work
as a result of a labor dispute with such workers.
(c) “Port” means a port formed under ORS 777.005 to 777.725 and 777.915 to 777.953 or
ORS chapter 778.
(d) “Public moneys” means moneys drawn from the  State Treasury or any special or
trust fund of the state government, including any moneys appropriated by the state govern-
ment and transferred to any public body, as defined in ORS 174.109.
(2) A developer or contractor that  is involved in the construction, operation or mainte-
nance of a covered project shall:
(a) Participate as a training  agent, as defined in ORS 660.010, in an apprenticeship pro-
gram registered with the State Apprenticeship and Training Council to provide  on-the-job
training opportunities for apprentices in apprenticeable occupations to perform  work on the
covered project such that at least 15 percent of the work hours of each apprenticeable  oc-
cupation is performed by apprentices;
(b) Establish and  execute a plan for outreach, recruitment and retention of women, mi-
nority individuals and veterans to perform work  on the covered project, with the aspirational
target of having at least 15 percent of total  work hours performed by individuals in one or
more of those groups;
(c) Pay wages to workers who perform  work on the covered project at a rate that is no
less than the greater of:
(A) The living wage for the locality or region where the work is performed;
(B) The prevailing rate of wage that the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and  In-
dustries determines under ORS 279C.815 for the trade or occupation  in the locality where the
work is performed;
(C) The minimum wage  specified under the Service Contract Act (41 U.S.C. 351-401) for
the work, or similar work, in the locality where the work is performed; or
(D) The wage specified under an applicable collective bargaining agreement, if any;
(d) Offer employer-paid family health insurance and retirement  benefits to workers who
perform work on the covered project;
(e) Demonstrate a history of material compliance in  the previous three years, or provide
available history for a new business, with federal and state wage and hour laws; and
(f) Demonstrate a history of material compliance in the previous three years, or  provide
available history for a new business, with the rules and other requirements of state agencies
with oversight regarding occupational safety and health.
(3)(a) A developer or contractor that is  involved in the construction, operation or main-
tenance of a covered  project shall require, in each contract entered into under the covered
project that uses $250,000 or more in public moneys, that steel, iron,  coatings for steel and
iron and manufactured products that a developer or contractor purchases for or uses under
the contract, and that become part of a permanent structure, must be  produced in the
United States.
(b) The requirements set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection do not apply if:
(A) The requirement is inconsistent with the public interest;
(B) Steel, iron, coatings  for steel and iron or manufactured products required for the
covered project are not produced in the United States in sufficient  and reasonably available
quantities and with satisfactory quality; or
Enrolled House Bill 4080 (HB 4080-B) Page 3
(C) Using steel, iron,  coatings for steel and iron or manufactured products produced in
the United States for the project will increase  the cost of the covered project by more than
25 percent.
(4) The developer or contractor shall periodically submit proof  of compliance with the
requirements described in subsections (2) and (3) of  this section. A copy of an executed
workforce development agreement, as described in subsection (5) of this section, may be
submitted as proof of compliance and shall be prima facie proof of compliance.
(5) A developer or contractor  may comply with the requirements described in subsections
(2) and (3) of this section by entering into  a workforce development agreement that covers
the work performed on the covered project. The workforce  development agreement must
provide for and include, at a minimum, the following:
(a) A project labor agreement,  as defined in 48 C.F.R. 52.222-34, as in effect on the ef-
fective date of this  2024 Act. The project labor agreement must cover all workers who per-
form work on the covered project who are covered by the Davis-Bacon Act (40 U.S.C. 3141
et seq.).  The terms and conditions of the project labor agreement must meet or exceed the
requirements provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(b) A labor peace agreement that  covers all workers who perform work on the covered
project who are not covered by a project  labor agreement described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection. The labor peace agreement must be  signed by the developer or contractor and
one or more bona fide labor organizations. The  terms and conditions of the labor peace
agreement must be  binding and meet or exceed the requirements provided in subsection (2)
of this section and:
(A) Provide that the developer or contractor will refrain  from declaring or initiating a
lockout and that  the bona fide labor organization will refrain from engaging in picketing,
work stoppages or boycotts against the covered project;
(B) Guarantee the  labor organization’s right to obtain recognition as the exclusive col-
lective bargaining representative of the workers through a process of having a majority of
the workers in a unit sign authorization cards; and
(C) Require the developer or contractor to remain neutral with respect  to any efforts by
a labor organization to represent the workers.
(c) An  agreement to utilize or develop domestic supply chains for the manufactured
products used  in the construction, maintenance or operation of the covered project. The
terms and conditions of the agreement  must meet or exceed the requirements provided in
subsection (3) of this section.
(6) The Land Conservation and Development Commission may adopt rules as necessary
to carry out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 9.
Rulemaking. The Land Conservation and Development  Commission may ex-
ercise its rulemaking authority under  ORS 197.040 to support the state policies described in
sections 1, 2 and 7 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 10. Appropriation. Notwithstanding any  other provision of law, the General
Fund appropriation made to the Department of Land Conservation and  Development by sec-
tion 1 (1), chapter 455, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for  the
planning program, is increased by  $998,072 for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of
sections 1 to 9 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 11. Expenditure limitation. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expendi-
tures, the limitation on expenditures  established by section 2, chapter 471, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, as the  maximum limit for payment of expenses from
fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous  Receipts, but excluding lottery
funds and federal funds,  collected or received by the Bureau of Labor and Industries is in-
creased by $199,192, for workload related to apprenticeship and prevailing wage as  related to
offshore wind energy development.
Enrolled House Bill 4080 (HB 4080-B) Page 4
SECTION 12. Section captions. The section captions  used in this 2024 Act are provided
only for the convenience of the reader and do not become part of  the statutory law of this
state or express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 13. Effective date. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preserva-
tion of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2024
Act takes effect on its passage.
Passed by House March 5, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4080 (HB 4080-B) Page 5